Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.050

Meetings.

Regular meetings of the commission shall be held on the second Monday after the election of the commissioners and thereafter at least once each week on a day to be fixed by ordinance. Special meetings may be called by the mayor or two commissioners. All meetings of the commission shall be open to the public.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.050. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 15, part; RRS s 9104, part.]